Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0158.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the event online ticket sales act. Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) Bot means an automated software application programmed to perform automatic and repetitive tasks and that is designed to impersonate or replicate human activity online. (b) Entertainment event means a concert, theatrical performance, sporting event, exhibition, show, or similar scheduled activity held in this state that meets all of the following: (i) Is open to the public. (ii) Is held in a public or private venue. (iii) Charges an admission fee to attend. (c) Person means any of the following: (i) An individual. (ii) A sole proprietorship, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, or other legal entity. (iii) A combination of persons described in subparagraphs (i) and (ii). (d) Ticket means a physical, electronic, or other form of a certificate, voucher, document, token, or other evidence indicating that the person entitled to possession through purchase or otherwise has a right to enter a venue for an entertainment event at the date and time specified on the ticket. (e) Ticket purchasing limit means the posted limit stating the number of tickets a person may purchase for a specific entertainment event during an online ticket sale. Sec. 5. A person shall not use or create a bot to do any of the following: (a) Purchase an amount of tickets for an entertainment event in excess of the ticket purchasing limit. (b) Use multiple internet protocol addresses, purchaser accounts, or email addresses to purchase an amount of tickets for an entertainment event in excess of the ticket purchasing limit. (c) Circumvent or disable an electronic queue, waiting period, presale code, or other sales volume limitation system associated with an online ticket sale. (d) Circumvent or disable a security measure, access control system, or other control or measure that is used to validate that a ticket is not fraudulent. Enacting section 1. This act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4262 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor